District of Columbia statutes.
7-2854

Penalties.

(a)

Any person who violates the provisions of this chapter shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000. The Corporation Counsel of the District of Columbia may bring an action to restrain violations of the provisions of this chapter.

(b)

Any person who willfully and intentionally violates the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be subject to the following:

(1)

On a first offense, a fine of not more than $5,000 or imprisonment for not more than 30 days, or both; and

(2)

On a second or subsequent offense, a fine of not more than $10,000 or imprisonment for not more than 90 days, or both.

History

Apr. 4, 2001, D.C. Law 13-272, § 5, 48 DCR 1633